Utah statutes.
76-8-508.   Tampering with witness -- Receiving or soliciting a bribe.

(1)  A person is guilty of the third degree felony of tampering with a witness if, believing that an official proceeding or investigation is pending or about to be instituted, or with the intent to prevent an official proceeding or investigation, he attempts to induce or otherwise cause another person to:

(a)  testify or inform falsely;

(b)  withhold any testimony, information, document, or item;

(c)  elude legal process summoning him to provide evidence; or

(d)  absent himself from any proceeding or investigation to which he has been summoned.

(2)  A person is guilty of the third degree felony of soliciting or receiving a bribe as a witness if he solicits, accepts, or agrees to accept any benefit in consideration of his doing any of the acts specified under Subsection (1).

(3)  The offense of tampering with a witness or soliciting or receiving a bribe under this section does not merge with any other substantive offense committed in the course of committing any offense under this section.

